Nevada, session 83, SB269.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 363A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay a tax pursuant to NRS
363A.130 may receive a credit against the tax otherwise due for
any donation of money made by the taxpayer to the Graduate
Medical Education Grant Program established by NRS 223.637 in
the manner provided by this section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to the Graduate Medical
Education Grant Program shall, before making such a donation,
apply to the Office of Science, Innovation and Technology for
approval of the credit authorized by subsection 1 for the donation.
The Office shall, within 20 days after receiving the application,
approve or deny the application and provide to the taxpayer notice
of the decision and, if the application is approved, the amount of
the credit authorized. Upon receipt of notice that the application
has been approved, the taxpayer must, not later than 30 days after
receiving the notice, make the donation of money to the Program.
Upon receipt of the donation, the Office shall issue a certificate of
the credit authorized by subsection 1. If the taxpayer does not
make the donation of money to the Program within 30 days after
receiving the notice, the taxpayer forfeits any claim to the credit
authorized by subsection 1. The Office shall notify the Department
of Taxation of each application approved pursuant to this
subsection, the issuance of each certificate of the credit authorized
by subsection 1 and the forfeiture of any claim to a credit
authorized by subsection 1.
3. The Office of Science, Innovation and Technology shall
approve or deny applications for the credit authorized by
subsection 1 in the order in which the applications are received.
4. The Office of Science, Innovation and Technology may,
for each fiscal year, approve applications for the credit authorized
by subsection 1 until the total amount of the credits authorized by
subsection 1 and approved by the Office pursuant to this
subsection and subsection 4 of section 3 of this act is:
(a) For Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $4,000,000;
-
*SB269*

– 3 –
(b) For Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $4,120,000; and
(c) For each subsequent fiscal year, an amount equal to 103
percent of the amount authorized for the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
 The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant to
subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized for any fiscal year.
5. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Office of
Science, Innovation and Technology for the credit authorized by
subsection 1, the amount of the credit provided by this section is
equal to the amount approved by the Office pursuant to subsection
2, which must not exceed the amount of the donation made by the
taxpayer to the Graduate Medical Education Grant Program. The
total amount of the credit applied against the taxes described in
subsection 1 and otherwise due from a taxpayer must not exceed
the amount of the donation.
6. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may,
after applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due,
carry the balance of the credit forward for not more than 5 years
after the end of the calendar year in which the donation is made
or until the balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
Sec. 2. NRS 363A.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363A.130 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.203,
there is hereby imposed an excise tax on each employer at the rate
of 2 percent of the wages, as defined in NRS 612.190, paid by the
employer during a calendar quarter with respect to employment in
connection with the business activities of the employer.
2. The tax imposed by this section:
(a) Does not apply to any person or other entity or any wages
this State is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution, laws or
treaties of the United States or the Nevada Constitution.
(b) Must not be deducted, in whole or in part, from any wages of
persons in the employment of the employer.
3. Each employer shall, on or before the last day of the month
immediately following each calendar quarter for which the
employer is required to pay a contribution pursuant to
NRS 612.535:
(a) File with the Department a return on a form prescribed by
the Department; and
(b) Remit to the Department any tax due pursuant to this section
for that calendar quarter.
4. In determining the amount of the tax due pursuant to this
section, an employer is entitled to subtract from the amount
-
*SB269*

– 4 –
calculated pursuant to subsection 1 a credit in an amount equal to 50
percent of the amount of the commerce tax paid by the employer
pursuant to chapter 363C of NRS for the preceding taxable year.
The credit may only be used for any of the 4 calendar quarters
immediately following the end of the taxable year for which the
commerce tax was paid. The amount of credit used for a calendar
quarter may not exceed the amount calculated pursuant to
subsection 1 for that calendar quarter. Any unused credit may not be
carried forward beyond the fourth calendar quarter immediately
following the end of the taxable year for which the commerce tax
was paid, and a taxpayer is not entitled to a refund of any unused
credit.
5. An employer who makes a donation of money to a
scholarship organization during the calendar quarter for which a
return is filed pursuant to this section is entitled, in accordance with
NRS 363A.139, to a credit equal to the amount authorized pursuant
to NRS 363A.139 against any tax otherwise due pursuant to this
section. As used in this subsection, “scholarship organization” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
6. An employer who makes a donation of money to the
Graduate Medical Education Grant Program established by NRS
223.637 during the calendar quarter for which a return is filed
pursuant to this section is entitled, in accordance with section 1 of
this act, to a credit equal to the amount authorized pursuant to
section 1 of this act against any tax otherwise due pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 3. Chapter 363B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay a tax pursuant to NRS
363B.110 may receive a credit against the tax otherwise due for
any donation of money made by the taxpayer to the Graduate
Medical Education Grant Program established by NRS 223.637 in
the manner provided by this section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to the Graduate Medical
Education Grant Program shall, before making such a donation,
apply to the Office of Science, Innovation and Technology for
approval of the credit authorized by subsection 1 for the donation.
The Office shall, within 20 days after receiving the application,
approve or deny the application and provide to the taxpayer notice
of the decision and, if the application is approved, the amount of
the credit authorized. Upon receipt of notice that the application
has been approved, the taxpayer must, not later than 30 days after
receiving the notice, make the donation of money to the Program.
Upon receipt of the donation, the Office shall issue a certificate of
-
*SB269*

– 5 –
the credit authorized by subsection 1. If the taxpayer does not
make the donation of money to the Program within 30 days after
receiving the notice, the taxpayer forfeits any claim to the credit
authorized by subsection 1. The Office shall notify the Department
of Taxation of each application approved pursuant to this
subsection, the issuance of each certificate of the credit authorized
by subsection 1 and the forfeiture of any claim to a credit
authorized by subsection 1.
3. The Office of Science, Innovation and Technology shall
approve or deny applications for the credit authorized by
subsection 1 in the order in which the applications are received.
4. The Office of Science, Innovation and Technology may,
for each fiscal year, approve applications for the credit authorized
by subsection 1 until the total amount of the credits authorized by
subsection 1 and approved by the Office pursuant to this
subsection and subsection 4 of section 1 of this act is:
(a) For Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $4,000,000;
(b) For Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $4,120,000; and
(c) For each subsequent fiscal year, an amount equal to 103
percent of the amount authorized for the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
 The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant to
subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized for any fiscal year.
5. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Office of
Science, Innovation and Technology for the credit authorized by
subsection 1, the amount of the credit provided by this section is
equal to the amount approved by the Office pursuant to subsection
2, which must not exceed the amount of the donation made by the
taxpayer to the Graduate Medical Education Grant Program. The
total amount of the credit applied against the taxes described in
subsection 1 and otherwise due from a taxpayer must not exceed
the amount of the donation.
6. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may,
after applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due,
carry the balance of the credit forward for not more than 5 years
after the end of the calendar year in which the donation is made
or until the balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
Sec. 4. NRS 363B.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363B.110 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.203,
there is hereby imposed an excise tax on each employer at the rate
of 1.475 percent of the amount by which the sum of all the wages,
as defined in NRS 612.190, paid by the employer during a calendar
-
*SB269*

– 6 –
quarter with respect to employment in connection with the business
activities of the employer exceeds $50,000.
2. The tax imposed by this section:
(a) Does not apply to any person or other entity or any wages
this State is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution, laws or
treaties of the United States or the Nevada Constitution.
(b) Must not be deducted, in whole or in part, from any wages of
persons in the employment of the employer.
3. Each employer shall, on or before the last day of the month
immediately following each calendar quarter for which the
employer is required to pay a contribution pursuant to
NRS 612.535:
(a) File with the Department a return on a form prescribed by
the Department; and
(b) Remit to the Department any tax due pursuant to this chapter
for that calendar quarter.
4. In determining the amount of the tax due pursuant to this
section, an employer is entitled to subtract from the amount
calculated pursuant to subsection 1 a credit in an amount equal to 50
percent of the amount of the commerce tax paid by the employer
pursuant to chapter 363C of NRS for the preceding taxable year.
The credit may only be used for any of the 4 calendar quarters
immediately following the end of the taxable year for which the
commerce tax was paid. The amount of credit used for a calendar
quarter may not exceed the amount calculated pursuant to
subsection 1 for that calendar quarter. Any unused credit may not be
carried forward beyond the fourth calendar quarter immediately
following the end of the taxable year for which the commerce tax
was paid, and a taxpayer is not entitled to a refund of any unused
credit.
5. An employer who makes a donation of money to a
scholarship organization during the calendar quarter for which a
return is filed pursuant to this section is entitled, in accordance with
NRS 363B.119, to a credit equal to the amount authorized pursuant
to NRS 363B.119 against any tax otherwise due pursuant to this
section. As used in this subsection, “scholarship organization” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
6. An employer who makes a donation of money to the
Graduate Medical Education Grant Program established by NRS
223.637 during the calendar quarter for which a return is filed
pursuant to this section is entitled, in accordance with section 3 of
this act, to a credit equal to the amount authorized pursuant to
section 3 of this act against any tax otherwise due pursuant to this
section.
-
*SB269*

– 7 –
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB269*